Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201658-823
Authority; adopt seal.

The authority
may adopt an official seal and alter the same at its pleasure.

Laws 1981, LB 321, § 20;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2920;

Laws 1995, LB 5, § 20;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 85-1720;

Laws 2013, LB170, § 23.